Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.033

Qualifications—Military training and experience.

An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training and experience requirements of this chapter unless the board determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

[ 2011 c 32 s 8.]